Mississippi, session 2026, SB2351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-15-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-103.  As used in this article: (a)  "Agency" means a residential child-caring agency or a child-placing agency. (b)  "Child" or "children" mean(s) any unmarried person or persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. (c)  "Child placing" means receiving, accepting or providing custody or care for any child under eighteen (18) years of age, temporarily or permanently, for the purpose of: (i)  Finding a person to adopt the child; (ii)  Placing the child temporarily or permanently in a home for adoption; or (iii)  Placing a child in a foster home or residential child-caring agency. (d)  "Child-placing agency" means any entity or person which places children in foster boarding homes or foster homes for temporary care or for adoption or any other entity or person or group of persons who are engaged in providing adoption studies or foster care studies or placement services as defined by the rules of the department. (e) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services. (f)  "Family boarding home" or "foster home" means a home (occupied residence) operated by any entity or person which provides residential child care to at least one (1) child but not more than six (6) children who are not related to the primary caregivers. (g)  "Group care home" means any place or facility operated by any entity or person which provides residential child care for at least seven (7) children but not more than twelve (12) children who are not related to the primary caregivers. (h) "Licensee" means any person, agency or entity licensed under this article. (i)  "Maternity home" means any place or facility operated by any entity or person which receives, treats or cares for more than one (1) child or adult who is pregnant out of wedlock, either before, during or within two (2) weeks after childbirth; provided, that the licensed child-placing agencies and licensed maternity homes may use a family boarding home approved and supervised by the agency or home, as a part of their work, for as many as three (3) children or adults who are pregnant out of wedlock, and provided further, that the provisions of this definition shall not include children or women who receive maternity care in the home of a person to whom they are kin within the sixth degree of kindred computed according to civil law, nor does it apply to any maternity care provided by general or special hospitals licensed according to law and in which maternity treatment and care are part of the medical services performed and the care of children is brief and incidental. (j)  "Person associated with a licensee" means an owner, director, member of the governing body, employee, provider of care and volunteer of a human services licensee. (k) "Related" means children, step-children, grandchildren, step-grandchildren, siblings of the whole or half-blood, step-siblings, nieces or nephews of the primary care provider. (l)  "Residential child care" means the provision of supervision, and/or protection, and meeting the basic needs of a child for twenty-four (24) hours per day, which may include services to children in a residential setting where care, lodging, maintenance and counseling or therapy for alcohol or controlled substance abuse or for any other emotional disorder or mental illness is provided for children, whether for compensation or not. (m)  "Residential child-caring agency" means any place or facility operated by any entity or person, public or private, providing residential child care, regardless of whether operated for profit or whether a fee is charged.  Such residential child-caring agencies include, but are not limited to, maternity homes, runaway shelters, group homes that are administered by an agency, and emergency shelters that are not in private residence. SECTION 2.  Section 43-15-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-105.  (1)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall be the licensing authority under this article, and is vested with all the powers, duties and responsibilities described in this article.  The department shall make and establish rules and regulations regarding: (a)  Approving, extending, denying, suspending and revoking licenses for foster homes, residential child-caring agencies and child-placing agencies; (b)  Conditional licenses, variances from department rules and exclusions; (c)  Basic health and safety standards for licensees; and (d)  Minimum administration and financial requirements for licensees. (2)  The department shall: (a)  Define information that shall be submitted to the department with an application for a license; (b)  Establish guidelines for the administration and maintenance of client and service records, including staff qualifications, staff to client ratios; (c)  Issue licenses in accordance with this article; (d)  Conduct surveys and inspections of licensees and facilities; (e)  Establish and collect licensure fees; (f)  Investigate complaints regarding any licensee or facility; (g)  Have access to all records, correspondence and financial data required to be maintained by a licensee or facility; (h)  Have authority to interview any client, family member of a client, employee or officer of a licensee or facility; and (i)  Have authority to revoke, suspend or extend any license issued by the department. SECTION 3.  Section 43-15-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-107.  (1)  Except as provided in Section 43-15-111, no person, agency, firm, corporation, association or other entity, acting individually or jointly with any other person or entity, may establish, conduct or maintain foster homes, residential child-caring agencies and child-placing agencies or facility and/or engage in child placing in this state without a valid and current license issued by and under the authority of the department as provided by this article and the rules of the department.  Any out-of-state child-placing agency that provides a full range of services, including, but not limited to, adoptions, foster family homes, adoption counseling services or financial aid, in this state must be licensed by the department under this article. (2)  No license issued under this article is assignable or transferable. (3)  A current license shall at all times be posted in each licensee's facility, in a place that is visible and readily accessible to the public. (4)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, each license issued under this article expires at midnight (Central Standard Time) twelve (12) months from the date of issuance unless it has been: (i)  Previously revoked by the department; or (ii)  Voluntarily returned to the department by the licensee. (b)  (i)  For any child-placing agency located in Mississippi that remains in good standing, the license issued under this article expires at midnight (Central Standard Time) twenty-four (24) months from the date of issuance unless it has been: 1.  Previously revoked by the department; or 2. Voluntarily returned to the department by the licensee. (ii)  Any child-placing agency whose license is governed by this paragraph (b) shall submit the following information to the department annually: 1.  A copy of an audit report and IRS Form 990 for the agency; 2.  The agency's fee schedule; and 3.  The agency's client list. (c)  A license may be renewed upon application and payment of the applicable fee, provided that the licensee meets the license requirements established by this article and the rules and regulations of the department. (5)  Any licensee or facility which is in operation at the time rules are made in accordance with this article shall be given a reasonable time for compliance as determined by the rules of the department. SECTION 4.  Section 43-15-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-109.  (1)  An application for a license under this article shall be made to the department and shall contain information that the department determines is necessary in accordance with established rules. (2)  Information received by the office through reports, complaints, investigations and inspections shall be classified as public in accordance with Title 25, Chapter 61, Mississippi Code of 1972, Mississippi Public Records Act. SECTION 5.  Section 43-15-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-111.  The provisions of this article, do not apply to: (a)  A facility or program owned or operated by an agency of the State of Mississippi or United States government; (b)  A facility or program operated by or under an exclusive contract with the Department of Corrections; (c)  Schools and educational programs and facilities, the primary purpose of which is to provide a regular course of study necessary for advancement to a higher educational level or completion of a prescribed course of study, and which may, incident to such educational purposes, provide boarding facilities to the students of such programs. (d)  Any residential child-caring agency and/or child-placing agency operated or conducted under the auspices of a religious institution and meeting the requirements or conditions of this section shall be exempt from the licensure requirements of this article under the following conditions:  (i) such religious institution must have a tax-exempt status as a nonprofit religious institution in accordance with Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, or the real property owned and exclusively occupied by the religious institution must be exempt from location taxation, and (ii) the agency or institution must be in compliance with the requirements of the Child Residential Home Notification Act, Section 43-16-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, and must not be in violation of Section 43-16-21(c) regarding the abuse and/or neglect of any child served by such home who has been adjudicated by the youth court as an abused and/or neglected child.  Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency operated by or conducted under the auspices of a religious institution from obtaining a license pursuant to this article. (e)  Placement of custody under a power of attorney executed under Section 93-31-1 et seq. SECTION 6.  Section 43-15-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-113.  (1)  If a license is revoked, the department may grant a new license after: (a)  Satisfactory evidence is submitted to the department, evidencing that the conditions upon which revocation was based have been corrected; and (b)  Inspection and compliance with all provisions of this article and applicable rules. (2)  The department may only suspend a license for a period of time which does not exceed the current expiration date of that license. (3)  When a license has been suspended, the department may completely or partially restore the suspended license upon a determination that the: (a)  Conditions upon which the suspension was based have been completely or partially corrected; and (b)  Interests of the public will not be jeopardized by restoration of the license. SECTION 7.  Section 43-15-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-115.  (1)  The department may, for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with the provisions of this article and its rules and regulations, enter and inspect on a routine basis the facility of a licensee. (2)  Before conducting an inspection under subsection (1), the department shall, after identifying the person in charge: (a)  Give proper identification; (b)  Request to see the applicable license; (c)  Describe the nature and purpose of the inspection; and (d)  If necessary, explain the authority of the department to conduct the inspection and the penalty for refusing to permit the inspection. (3)  In conducting an inspection under subsection (1), the department may, after meeting the requirements of subsection (2): (a)  Inspect the physical facilities; (b)  Inspect records and documents; (c)  Interview directors, employees, clients, family members of clients and others; and (d)  Observe the licensee in operation. (4)  An inspection conducted under subsection (1) shall be during regular business hours and may be announced or unannounced. (5)  The licensee shall make copies of inspection reports available to the public upon request. (6)  The provisions of this section apply to on-site inspections and do not restrict the department from contacting family members, neighbors or other individuals, or from seeking information from other sources to determine compliance with the provisions of this article. SECTION 8.  Section 43-15-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-117.  (1)  Except as provided in this article, no person, agency, firm, corporation, association or group children's home may engage in child placing, or solicit money or other assistance for child placing, without a valid license issued by the department.  No out-of-state child-placing agency that provides a full range of services, including, but not limited to, adoptions, foster family homes, adoption counseling services or financial aid, may operate in this state without a valid license issued by the department.  No child-placing agency shall advertise in the media markets in Mississippi seeking birth mothers or their children for adoption purposes unless the agency holds a valid and current license issued either by the department or the authorized governmental licensing agency of another state that regulates child-placing agencies.  Any child-placing agency, physician or attorney who advertises for child placing or adoption services in Mississippi shall be required by the department to show their principal office location on all media advertising for adoption services. (2)  An attorney who provides legal services to a client in connection with proceedings for the adoption of a child by the client, who does not receive, accept or provide custody or care for the child for the purposes specified in Section 43-15-103(c), shall not be required to have a license under this article to provide those legal services. (3)  An attorney, physician or other person may assist a parent in identifying or locating a person interested in adopting the parent's child, or in identifying or locating a child to be adopted.  However, no payment, charge, fee, reimbursement of expense, or exchange of value of any kind, or promise or agreement to make the same, may be made for that assistance. (4)  Nothing in this section precludes payment of reasonable fees for medical, legal or other lawful services rendered in connection with the care of a mother, delivery and care of a child including, but not limited to, the mother's living expenses, or counseling for the parents and/or the child, and for the legal proceedings related to lawful adoption proceedings; and no provision of this section abrogates the right of procedures for independent adoption as provided by law. (5)  The department is specifically authorized to promulgate rules under the Administrative Procedures Law, Title 25, Chapter 43, Mississippi Code of 1972, to regulate fees charged by licensed child-placing agencies, if it determines that the practices of those licensed child-placing agencies demonstrates that the fees charged are excessive or that any of the agency's practices are deceptive or misleading; however, those rules regarding fees shall take into account the use of any sliding fee by an agency that uses a sliding fee procedure to permit prospective adoptive parents of varying income levels to utilize the services of those agencies or persons. (6)  The department shall promulgate rules under the Administrative Procedures Law, Title 25, Chapter 43, Mississippi Code of 1972, to require that all licensed child-placing agencies provide written disclosures to all prospective adoptive parents of any fees or other charges for each service performed by the agency or person, and file an annual report with the department that states the fees and charges for those services, and to require them to inform the department in writing thirty (30) days in advance of any proposed changes to the fees or charges for those services. (7)  The department is specifically authorized to disclose to prospective adoptive parents or other interested persons any fees charged by any licensed child-placing agency, attorney or counseling service or counselor for all legal and counseling services provided by that licensed child-placing agency, attorney or counseling service or counselor. SECTION 9.  Section 43-15-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-119.  (1)  If the department finds that a violation has occurred under this article or the rules and regulations of the department, it may: (a)  Deny, suspend or revoke a license or place the licensee on probation, if the department discovers that a licensee is not in compliance with the laws, standards or regulations governing its operation, and/or it finds evidence of aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal act; or (b)  Restrict or prohibit new admissions to the licensee's program or facility, if the department discovers that a licensee is not in compliance with the laws, standards or regulations governing its operation, and/or it finds evidence of aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal act. (2)  If placed on probation, the agency or licensee shall post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place as directed by the department and with the agency's or individual's license, and the agency shall notify the custodians of each of the children in its care in writing of the agency's status and the basis for the probation. SECTION 10.  Section 43-15-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-123.  Any person, agency, association, corporation, institution, society or other organization violating the provisions of this article shall be guilty of illegal placement of children and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment not more than five (5) years, or both such fine and imprisonment. SECTION 11.  Section 43-15-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-125.  The department and/or its officers, employees, attorneys and representatives shall not be held civilly liable for any findings, recommendations or actions taken pursuant to this article. SECTION 12.  Section 49-7-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-7-27.  (1)  The commission may revoke any hunting, trapping, or fishing privileges, license or deny any person the right to secure such license if the person has been convicted of the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation thereunder.  The revocation of the privilege, license or refusal to grant license shall be for a period of one (1) year.  However, before the revocation of the privilege or license shall become effective, the executive director shall send by registered mail notice to the person or licensee, who shall have the right to a hearing or representation before the commission at the next regular meeting or a special meeting.  The notice shall set out fully the ground or complaint upon which revocation of, or refusal to grant, the privilege or license is sought. (2)  Any person who is convicted for a second time during any period of twelve (12) consecutive months for violation of any of the laws with respect to game, fish or nongame fish or animals shall forfeit his privilege and any license or licenses issued to him by the commission and the commission shall not issue the person any license for a period of one (1) year from the date of forfeiture. (3)  Failure of any person to surrender his license or licenses upon demand made by the commission or by its representatives at the direction of the commission shall be a misdemeanor and shall be punishable as such. (4)  Any violator whose privilege or license has been revoked, who shall, during the period of revocation, be apprehended for hunting or fishing, shall have imposed upon him a mandatory jail term of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months. (5)  The commission is authorized to suspend any license issued to any person under this chapter for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (6)  If a person is found guilty or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of Section 49-7-95, and then appeals, the commission shall suspend or revoke the hunting privileges of that person pending the determination of his appeal. (7)  (a)  If a person does not comply with a summons or a citation or does not pay a fine, fee or assessment for violating a wildlife law or regulation, the commission shall revoke the fishing, hunting, or trapping privileges of that person.  When a person does not comply or fails to pay, the clerk of the court shall notify the person in writing by first class mail that if the person does not comply or pay within ten (10) days from the date of mailing, the court will notify the commission and the commission will revoke the fishing, hunting or trapping privileges of that person.  The cost of notice may be added to other court costs.  If the person does not comply or pay as required, the court clerk shall immediately mail a copy of the court record and a copy of the notice to the commission.  After receiving notice from the court, the commission shall revoke the fishing, hunting or trapping privileges of that person. (b)  A person whose fishing, hunting or trapping privileges have been revoked under this subsection shall remain revoked until the person can show proof that all obligations of the court have been met. (c)  A person shall pay a Twenty-five Dollar ($25.00) fee to have his privileges reinstated.  The fee shall be paid to the department. SECTION 13.  Section 93-11-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 93-11-155.  (1)  In the manner and form prescribed by the division, all licensing entities shall provide to the division, on at least a quarterly basis, information on licensees for use in the establishment, enforcement and collection of child support obligations including, but not limited to: name, address, Social Security number, sex, date of birth, employer's name and address, type of license, effective date of the license, expiration date of the license, and active or inactive license status.  Whenever technologically feasible, the department and licensing entities shall seek to reach agreements to provide the information required by this section by way of electronic data media, including, but not limited to, on-line access and records on magnetic/optical disk or tape.  In lieu of providing the licensing information to the division as outlined above and in the discretion of the licensing entity, the division shall provide the identity of the individual who is delinquent in support payments to the licensing entity who will then match that information with their records and provide the division with all necessary information for those individuals licensed by that entity. (2)  Any licensed attorney representing the party to whom support is due may submit to the division the name and record of accounting showing an arrearage of an individual who is out of compliance with an order for support which is not being enforced by the division under Title IV-D, and the division shall submit the name of such individual to the licensing entities who will match the name with their records in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) to provide the attorney with necessary information regarding licensees.  The attorney applying for such information shall pay a fee not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for such service. SECTION 14.  Section 93-11-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 93-11-157.  (1)  The division shall review the information received under Section 93-11-155 and any other information available to the division, and shall determine if a licensee is out of compliance with an order for support.  If a licensee is out of compliance with the order for support, the division shall notify the licensee by first class mail that ninety (90) days after the licensee receives the notice of being out of compliance with the order, the licensing entity will be notified to immediately suspend the licensee's license unless the licensee pays the arrearage owing, according to the accounting records of the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the attorney representing the party to whom support is due, as the case may be, or enters into a stipulated agreement and agreed judgment establishing a schedule for the payment of the arrearage.  The licensee shall be presumed to have received the notice five (5) days after it is deposited in the mail. (2)  Upon receiving the notice provided in subsection (1) of this section the licensee may: (a)  Request a review with the division; however, the issues the licensee may raise at the review are limited to whether the licensee is the person required to pay under the order for support and whether the licensee is out of compliance with the order for support; or (b)  Request to participate in negotiations with the division for the purpose of establishing a payment schedule for the arrearage. (3)  The division director or the designees of the division director may and, upon request of a licensee, shall negotiate with a licensee to establish a payment schedule for the arrearage.  Payments made under the payment schedule shall be in addition to the licensee's ongoing obligation under the latest entered periodic order for support. (4)  Should the division and the licensee reach an agreement on a payment schedule for the arrearage, the division director may submit to the court a stipulated agreement and agreed judgment containing the payment schedule which, upon the court's approval, is enforceable as any order of the court.  If the court does not approve the stipulated agreement and agreed judgment, the court may require a hearing on a case-by-case basis for the judicial review of the payment schedule agreement. (5)  If the licensee and the division do not reach an agreement on a payment schedule for the arrearage, the licensee may move the court to establish a payment schedule.  However, this action does not stay the license suspension. (6)  The notice given to a licensee that the licensee's license will be suspended in ninety (90) days must clearly state the remedies and procedures that are available to a licensee under this section. (7)  If at the end of the ninety (90) days the licensee has an arrearage according to the accounting records of the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the attorney representing the party to whom support is due, as the case may be, and the licensee has not entered into a stipulated agreement and agreed judgment establishing a payment schedule for the arrearage, the division shall immediately notify all applicable licensing entities in writing to suspend the licensee's license, and the licensing entities shall immediately suspend the license and shall within three (3) business days notify the licensee and the licensee's employer, where known, of the license suspension and the date of such suspension by certified mail return receipt requested.  Within forty-eight (48) hours of receipt of a request in writing delivered personally, by mail or by electronic means, the department shall furnish to the licensee, licensee's attorney or other authorized representative a copy of the department's accounting records of the licensee's payment history.  A licensing entity shall immediately reinstate the suspended license upon the division's notification of the licensing entities in writing that the licensee no longer has an arrearage or that the licensee has entered into a stipulated agreement and agreed judgment. (8)  Within thirty (30) days after a licensing entity suspends the licensee's license at the direction of the division under subsection (7) of this section, the licensee may appeal the license suspension to the chancery court of the county in which the licensee resides or to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, upon giving bond with sufficient sureties in the amount of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), approved by the clerk of the chancery court and conditioned to pay any costs that may be adjudged against the licensee.  Notice of appeal shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court.  If there is an appeal, the appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the chancery court, act as a supersedeas of the license suspension.  The department shall be the appellee in the appeal, and the licensing entity shall not be a party in the appeal.  The chancery court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision within thirty (30) days of the filing of the appeal.  The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. The decision of the chancery court may be appealed to the Supreme Court in the manner provided by the rules of the Supreme Court.  In the discretion of and on motion to the chancery court, no person shall be allowed to practice any business, occupation or profession or take any other action under the authority of any license the suspension of which has been affirmed by the chancery court while an appeal to the Supreme Court from the decision of the chancery court is pending. (9)  If a licensee who has entered a stipulated agreement and agreed judgment for the payment of an arrearage under this section subsequently is out of compliance with an order for support, the division shall immediately notify the licensing entity to suspend the licensee's license, and the licensing entity shall immediately suspend the license without a hearing and shall within three (3) business days notify the licensee in writing of the license suspension.  In the case of a license suspension under the provisions of this subsection, the procedures provided for under subsections (1) and (2) of this section are not required; however, the appeal provisions of subsection (8) of this section still apply. After suspension of the license, if the licensee subsequently enters into a stipulated agreement and agreed judgment or the licensee otherwise informs the division of compliance with the order for support, the division shall within seven (7) days notify in writing the licensing entity that the licensee is in compliance. Upon receipt of that notice from the division, a licensing entity shall immediately reinstate the license of the licensee and shall within three (3) business days notify the licensee of the reinstatement. (10)  Nothing in this section prohibits a licensee from filing a motion for the modification of an order for support or for any other applicable relief.  However, no such action shall stay the license suspension procedure, except as may be allowed under subsection (8) of this section. (11)  If a license is suspended under the provisions of this section, the licensing entity is not required to refund any fees paid by a licensee in connection with obtaining or renewing a license. (12)  The requirement of a licensing entity to suspend a license under this section does not affect the power of the licensing entity to deny, suspend, revoke or terminate a license for any other reason. (13)  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by this section and not by the general licensing and disciplinary provisions applicable to a licensing entity. Actions taken by a licensing entity in suspending a license when required by this section are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under the general licensing and disciplinary provisions applicable to the licensing entity.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by this section shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in subsection (8) of this section rather than any procedure specified in the general licensing and disciplinary provisions applicable to the licensing entity.  If there is any conflict between any provision of this section and any provision of the general licensing and disciplinary provisions applicable to a licensing entity, the provisions of this section shall control. (14)  No license shall be suspended under this section until ninety (90) days after July 1, 1996.  This ninety-day period shall be a one-time amnesty period in which any person who may be subject to license suspension under this article may comply with an order of support in order to avoid the suspension of any license. (15)  Any individual who fails to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings after receiving appropriate notice may be subject to suspension or withholding of issuance of a license under this section. SECTION 15.  Section 93-11-163, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 93-11-163.  In addition to the procedures in Section 93-11-157, the court may, upon a finding that a defendant is delinquent for being out of compliance with an order for support, order the licensing entity as defined in Section 93-11-153(a) to suspend the license of the defendant.  In its discretion, the court may stay such an order for a reasonable time to allow the defendant to purge himself of the delinquency.  If a license is suspended under this section, the court may also order the licensing entity to reinstate the license when it is satisfied that the defendant has purged himself of the delinquency.  Licensing entities shall treat a suspension under this section the same as a suspension under Section 93-11-157. Defendants whose license is suspended under this section shall be subject to any administrative fees established for reinstatement under Section 93-11-159. SECTION 16.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.